Nevada, session 83, AB353.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of
$2,400,000 to carry out an initiative for the purchase, distribution
and maintenance of tablet computers for the use of each student who
is:
(a) Enrolled at the University of Nevada, Reno, during the 2025-
2027 biennium; and
(b) Is eligible to receive a federal Pell Grant pursuant to 20
U.S.C. § 1070a, based on the eligibility requirements and awarding
rules in effect on December 31, 2024, as increased or decreased for
Fiscal Year 2025-2026 and Fiscal Year 2026-2027, respectively, in
an amount corresponding to the percentage of increase or decrease
in the Consumer Price Index (All Items) published by the United
States Department of Labor for the preceding fiscal year.
2. Upon acceptance of the money appropriated by subsection 1,
the University of Nevada, Reno, agrees to:
(a) On or before February 1, 2027, prepare and transmit a report
to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmission to
-
*AB353*

– 2 –
the Senate Standing Committee on Finance and the Assembly
Standing Committee on Ways and Means of the 84th Session of the
Nevada Legislature. The report must include, without limitation, as
of December 31, 2026:
(1) The number of students who participated in the initiative
set forth in subsection 1;
(2) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the initiative in
improving the academic performance of the students who
participated in the initiative;
(3) A summary of the statistics relating to usage of the
technology provided pursuant to the initiative; and
(4) An itemization of the use of the money appropriated by
subsection 1.
(b) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before September 17, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the University of
Nevada, Reno, through June 30, 2027.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB353*